California statutes. Business and Professions Code
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Financial Provisions [26228. - 26228.3.]

26228.

An association is not subject in any manner to the terms of the Corporate Securities Law (Division 1 (commencing with Section 25000) of Title 4 of the Corporations Code), and any association may issue its membership certificates or stock or other securities as provided in this chapter without the necessity of any qualification under that law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 107.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26228.1.

If an association issues nonpar value stock, the issuance of the stock shall be governed by the terms of all general laws that cover the issuance of nonpar value stock in domestic corporations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 107.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26228.2.

If an association with preferred shares of stock purchases the stock or any property, or any interest in any property of any person, it may discharge the obligations that are so incurred, wholly or in part, by exchanging for the acquired interest, shares of its preferred stock to an amount that at par value would equal the fair market value of the stock or interest so purchased, as determined by the board of directors. In that case, the transfer to the association of the stock or interest that is purchased is equivalent to payment in cash for the shares of stock that are issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 107.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26228.3.

The board of directors of every association shall cause to be sent to the members of the association not later than 120 days after the close of the fiscal or calendar year an annual report of the operations of the association, unless the report is expressly dispensed with in the bylaws. If required by the bylaws, interim reports of the operations of the association for the three-month, six-month, or nine-month periods of the current fiscal year of the association shall be furnished to the members of the association. Such annual report and any such interim reports shall include a balance sheet as of such closing date. Such financial statement shall be prepared from, and be in accordance with, the books. It shall be prepared in a form that is sanctioned by sound accounting practice for the association or approved by a duly
 certified public accountant or a public accountant.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 107.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Members [26229. - 26229.8.]

26229.

Under the terms and conditions that are prescribed in the bylaws adopted by it, an association may admit as members or issue common stock only to persons engaged in the cultivation of a cannabis product that is to be handled by or through the association.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 107.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26229.1.

If a member of a nonstock association is other than a natural person, the member may be represented by any individual, associate, officer, or manager or member of it, who is duly authorized in writing.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 107.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26229.2.

Any association may become a member or stockholder of any other association.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 107.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26229.3.

If a member of an association that is established without shares of stock has paid his membership fee in full, he or she shall receive a certificate of membership.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 107.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26229.4.

An association shall not issue a certificate for stock to a member until it has been fully paid for. The promissory notes of the members may be accepted by the association as full or partial payment. The association shall hold the stock as security for the payment of the note, but the retention as security does not affect the member’s right to vote.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 107.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26229.5.

An association, in its bylaws, may limit the amount of common stock that any member may own.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 107.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26229.6.

The bylaws shall prohibit the transfer of the common stock or membership certificates of the associations to a person that is not qualified to be a shareholder or member as specified in this chapter. These restrictions shall be printed upon every certificate of stock or membership that is subject to them.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 107.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26229.7.

The association may, at any time, as specified in the bylaws, except when the debts of the association exceed 50 percent of its assets, buy in or purchase its common stock at the book value of the common stock, as conclusively determined by the board of directors, and pay for it in cash within one year thereafter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 107.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26229.8.

A member or stockholder is not liable for the debts of the association to an amount that exceeds the sum that remains unpaid on his membership fee or his subscription to the capital stock, including any unpaid balance on any promissory note that is given in payment of the membership fee or the subscription to the capital stock.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 107.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Marketing Contracts [26230. - 26230.3.]

26230.

The association and its members may make and execute marketing contracts that require the members to sell, for any period of time, but not over 15 years, all or a specified part of a cannabis product exclusively to or through the association, or a facility that is created by the association. If the members contract a sale to the association, title to the cannabis product passes absolutely and unreservedly, except for recorded liens, to the association upon delivery or at another specified time that is expressly and definitely agreed in the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 107.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26230.1.

Notwithstanding any provisions of the Civil Code, a contract that is entered into by a member or stockholder of an association that provides for the delivery to the association of a cannabis product that is produced or acquired by the member or stockholder may be specifically enforced by the association to secure the delivery to it of the cannabis product.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 107.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26230.2.

The bylaws or a marketing contract may fix, as liquidated damages, specific sums to be paid by the member or stockholder to the association upon the breach by him or her of any provision of the marketing contract regarding the sale or delivery or withholding of a cannabis product and may provide that the member will pay all costs, premiums for bonds, expenses, and fees, if any action is brought upon the contract by the association. These provisions are valid and enforceable in the courts of this state. The clauses that provide for liquidated damages are enforceable as such and shall not be regarded as penalties.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 107.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26230.3.

If there is a breach or threatened breach of a marketing contract by a member, the association shall be entitled to an injunction to prevent the further breach of the contract and to a decree of specific performance of the contract. Pending the adjudication of the action and upon filing a verified complaint that shows the breach or threatened breach, and upon filing a sufficient bond, the association shall be entitled to a temporary restraining order and preliminary injunction against the member.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 107.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Reorganization of Corporations Organized Pursuant to Other Laws [26231. - 26231.2.]

26231.

A corporation that is organized or existing pursuant to any law except Part 12 (commencing with Section 14550) of Division 3 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code may be brought under the provisions of this chapter by amending its articles of incorporation, in the manner that is prescribed by the general corporation laws, to conform to this chapter. If a corporation amends its articles of incorporation to conform to this chapter, it shall be deemed to be organized and existing pursuant to, and entitled to the benefit of, and subject to this chapter for all purposes and as fully as though it had been originally organized pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 92, Sec. 32.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

26231.1.

Articles of incorporation shall be deemed to conform to this chapter within the meaning of Section 26231 if it clearly appears from the articles of incorporation that the corporation desires to be subject to, and to be organized, exist, and function pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 107.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26231.2.

If the amended articles conform, as provided in Section 26231.1, provisions in the articles of incorporation that appeared in the original articles or some previous amended articles, are ineffective if, and to the extent that, they are inapplicable to, or inconsistent with, this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 107.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 23. The California Cannabis Equity Act [26240. - 26250.]

26240.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Eligible local jurisdiction” means a local jurisdiction that demonstrates an intent to develop a local program or that has adopted or operates a local equity program.

(b) “Equity assessment” means an assessment conducted by the local jurisdiction that was used to inform the creation of a local equity program, and that assessment may include the following:

(1) Reference to local historical rates of arrests or convictions for cannabis law violations.

(2) Identification of the impacts that cannabis-related policies have had
 historically on communities and populations within that local jurisdiction.

(3) Other information that demonstrates how individuals and communities within the local jurisdiction have been disproportionately or negatively impacted by the War on Drugs.

(c) “Local equity applicant” means an applicant who has submitted, or will submit, an application to a local jurisdiction to engage in commercial cannabis activity within the jurisdictional boundaries of that jurisdiction and who meets the requirements of that jurisdiction’s local equity program.

(d) “Local equity licensee” means a person who has obtained a license from a local jurisdiction to engage in commercial cannabis activity within the jurisdictional boundaries of that jurisdiction and who meets the requirements of that jurisdiction’s local equity program.

(e) “Local equity program” means a program adopted or operated by a local jurisdiction that focuses on inclusion and support of individuals and communities in California’s cannabis industry who are linked to populations or neighborhoods that were negatively or disproportionately impacted by cannabis criminalization as evidenced by the local jurisdiction’s equity assessment. Local equity programs may include, but are not limited to, the following types of services:

(1) Small business support services offering technical assistance or professional and mentorship services to those persons from economically disadvantaged communities that experience high rates of poverty or communities most harmed by cannabis prohibition, determined by historically high rates of arrests or convictions for cannabis law violations.

(2) Tiered
 fees or fee waivers for cannabis-related permits and licenses.

(3) Assistance in paying state regulatory and licensing fees.

(4) Assistance securing business locations prior to or during the application process.

(5) Assistance securing capital investments or direct access to capital.

(6) Assistance with regulatory compliance.

(7) Assistance in recruitment, training, and retention of a qualified and diverse workforce, including transitional workers.

(8) Other services deemed by the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development to be consistent with the intent of this chapter.

(f) “Transitional worker” means a person who, at the time of starting employment at the business premises, resides in a ZIP Code or census track area with higher than average unemployment, crime, or child death rates, and faces at least one of the following barriers to employment: (1) is homeless; (2) is a custodial single parent; (3) is receiving public assistance; (4) lacks a GED or high school diploma; (5) has a criminal record or other involvement with the criminal justice system; (6) suffers from chronic unemployment; (7) is emancipated from the foster care system; (8) is a veteran; or (9) is over 65 years of age and is financially
 compromised.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 91.   (AB 141)   Effective July 12, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

26242.

(a) The department may provide technical assistance to a local equity program that helps local equity applicants or local equity licensees. When determining whether to provide technical assistance, the department shall make individual determinations based on the reasonableness of the request and available resources.

(b) “Technical assistance” includes providing training and educational sessions regarding state cannabis licensing and regulatory processes and requirements to equity applicants or equity licensees that are coordinated with the local equity program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 92.   (AB 141)   Effective July 12, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

26244.

(a) (1) An eligible local jurisdiction may, in the form and manner prescribed by the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development, submit an application to the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development for a grant to assist with the development of an equity program or to assist local equity applicants and local equity licensees through that local jurisdiction’s equity program.

(2) An eligible local jurisdiction that has a local equity program shall include in its application submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) the equity assessment that was used to inform the creation of the local equity program.

(3) The Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development shall consider the following factors when reviewing an application:

(A) Whether the local jurisdiction is an eligible local jurisdiction.

(B) Whether the local jurisdiction has identified communities and populations within that local jurisdiction that have been disproportionately or negatively impacted by arrests and convictions for cannabis law violations and has demonstrated a nexus between the individuals served through the local equity program and the communities and populations identified by the local jurisdiction.

(C) Whether the local jurisdiction has adopted or operates a local equity
 program, and, if so, the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development shall consider the following:

(i) How long the local jurisdiction has operated the program.

(ii) The outcomes of the program.

(D) Whether the local jurisdiction has demonstrated the ability to provide, or created a plan to provide, the services identified in subdivision (b).

(E) Whether the local jurisdiction has demonstrated a financial commitment to the implementation and administration of the program.

(F) Whether the local jurisdiction has demonstrated a commitment
 to remove, or has taken steps to remove, local barriers to entering the legal cannabis market for local equity applicants and local equity licensees, including, but not limited to, developing a local regulatory framework that facilitates an equitable and economically just industry.

(G) The number of existing and potential local equity applicants and local equity licensees in the local jurisdiction.

(H) Any additional relevant and reasonable criteria the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development deems necessary.

(4) The Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development shall grant funding to an eligible local jurisdiction based on the eligible local jurisdiction’s compliance with paragraph (2), if applicable, and its review of the factors in paragraph (3).

(b) (1) An eligible local jurisdiction that receives a grant pursuant to subdivision (a) shall use grant funds to do either of the following:

(A) Assist the local jurisdiction in the development of a local equity program.

(B) Assist local equity applicants or local equity licensees in that local jurisdiction to gain entry to, and to successfully operate in, the state’s regulated cannabis
 marketplace.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “assist” includes, but is not limited to, any of the following methods:

(A) To provide a low-interest or no-interest loan or a grant to a local equity applicant or local equity licensee to assist the applicant or licensee with startup and ongoing costs. For purposes of this paragraph, “startup and ongoing costs” include, but are not limited to, the following:

(i) Rent.

(ii) Leases.

(iii) Local and state application, licensing, and regulatory fees.

(iv) Legal assistance.

(v) Regulatory compliance.

(vi) Testing of cannabis.

(vii) Furniture.

(viii) Fixtures and equipment.

(ix) Capital improvements.

(x) Training and retention of a qualified and diverse workforce.

(B) To support local equity program efforts to provide sources of capital to local equity applicants and local equity licensees.

(C) To provide or fund direct technical assistance to local equity applicants and local equity licensees.

(D) To assist in the development or administration of local equity programs.

(E) To fund the creation of an equity assessment to inform the development of a local equity program.

(c) An eligible local jurisdiction that receives a grant pursuant to subdivision (a) shall, on or before January 1 of the year following receipt of the grant and annually thereafter for each year that grant funds are expended, submit an annual report to the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development that includes all of the following information:

(1) How the local jurisdiction disbursed grant funds.

(2) How the local jurisdiction identified local equity applicants or local equity licensees, including how the local jurisdiction determines who qualifies as a local equity applicant or local equity licensee.

(3) The number of local equity applicants and local equity licensees that were served by the grant funds.

(4) Aggregate demographic data on equity applicants, equity licensees, and all other applicants and licensees in the
 jurisdiction, including, but not limited to, race, ethnicity, gender, sexual orientation, income level, education level, prior convictions, and veteran status. This information will be consolidated and reported without the individual’s identifying information.

(5) If the local jurisdiction requires equity applicants to become eligible through specific ownership percentages, a breakdown of equity applicants’ and equity licensees’ business ownership types and percentages of ownership.

(6) Other information that the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development deems necessary to evaluate the outcomes of the program consistent with the intent of this chapter and that was specified in the grant agreement between the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development and the local jurisdiction.

(d) An eligible local jurisdiction that receives a grant pursuant to this section shall use no more than 10 percent of the state grant for administration, including employing staff or hiring consultants to administer grants and the program.

(e) The Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development may review, adopt, amend, and repeal guidelines to implement uniform standards, criteria, requirements, or forms that supplement or clarify the terms, references, or standards set forth in this section and Section 26240. The adoption, amendment, or repeal of a guideline, term, or standard authorized by this subdivision is hereby exempted from the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 93.   (AB 141)   Effective July 12, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

26246.

(a) To facilitate greater equity in business ownership and employment in the cannabis market, the department shall serve as a point of contact for local equity programs.

(b) On or before January 1, 2022, the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development shall publish on its internet website local equity ordinances that have been enacted by the legislative body of the respective local jurisdiction, and model local equity ordinances created by advocacy groups and experts. Advocacy groups and experts may include, but are not limited to, minority business owners and entrepreneurs, organizations with expertise in addressing barriers to employment and licensure for low-income communities or persons with prior arrests or convictions, and unions representing cannabis workers.

(c) To the extent feasible, the department and the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development shall coordinate with the relevant local jurisdictions to carry out the responsibilities described in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 94.   (AB 141)   Effective July 12, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

26248.

(a) On or before July 1, 2021, and annually thereafter, the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development shall submit a report to the Legislature regarding the progress of local equity programs that have received funding pursuant to Section 26244.

(b) The report shall include, but is not limited to, the following information:

(1) The local jurisdictions that have enacted local equity programs.

(2) A copy of the equity assessment and equity program description of each local jurisdiction that applied for grant funding pursuant to Section 26244.

(3) The number of local equity applicants and general applicants applying for and receiving
 licenses in the jurisdictions that received grants pursuant to Section 26244.

(4) Information collected pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 26244.

(c) The Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development shall post the report required by this section on its internet website.

(d) The report required by this section shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, and shall apply notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 95.   (AB 141)   Effective July 12, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

26249.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 26012 and 26180:

(1) On or before January 1, 2022, the department shall develop and implement a program to provide waivers for application fees, licensing fees, and renewal fees required by this division.

(2) On or before January 1, 2023, the department shall develop and implement a program to provide deferrals for application fees, licensing fees, and renewal fees required by this division.

(b) (1) At least 60 percent of the total dollar amount of deferrals of fees pursuant to the program developed and implemented by the department pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be allocated to the
 deferral of fees for equity applicants and licensees.

(2) At least 60 percent of the total dollar amount of waivers of fees pursuant to the program developed and implemented by the department pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be allocated to the waiver of fees for equity applicants and licensees.

(c) For purposes of this section, “equity applicants and licensees” means applicants and licensees that demonstrate all of the following:

(1) (A) For applicants and licensees in local jurisdictions with local equity programs, that they are locally verified equity applicants and licensees; or

(B) For applicants and licensees in local jurisdictions without local equity programs, that they are local applicants and licensees.

(2) That they, either individually or in combination with other persons who qualify as equity applicants or licensees pursuant to this section, own no less than 50 percent of the business that is in the process of being licensed or is licensed.

(3) That they satisfy one of the following:

(A) They have previously been convicted of an offense related to the sale, possession, use, manufacture, or cultivation of cannabis, under past criminal justice policies implementing cannabis prohibition.

(B) They have previously been arrested for an offense related to the sale, possession, use, manufacture, or cultivation of cannabis, under past criminal justice policies implementing cannabis prohibition.

(C) Residence in a household with a household income less than or equal to 60 percent of the area median income for the applicable local jurisdiction.

(D) Residence in an area with a population disproportionately impacted by past criminal justice policies implementing cannabis prohibition.

(4) The eligibility for those that qualify pursuant to the criteria listed under subparagraphs (A) to (D), inclusive, of paragraph (3) may be further refined by the department through regulations, including, but not limited to, regulations regarding the following:

(A) Criteria regarding the license or licenses an applicant or licensee may seek or hold.

(B) Criteria regarding the time period or length of time in which an applicant or licensee resided in a
 low-income household for purposes of subparagraph (C) of paragraph (3), or in an area with a population disproportionately impacted by past criminal justice policies implementing cannabis prohibition for purposes of subparagraph (D) of paragraph (3).

(d) The department may adopt regulations, including emergency regulations to implement this section. The adoption, amendment, repeal, or readoption of a regulation authorized by this section is deemed to address an emergency, for purposes of Sections 11346.1 and 11349.6 of the Government Code, and the department is hereby exempted from the requirements of subdivision (b) of Section 11346.1 of the Government Code.

(e) The operation of this section is contingent upon an appropriation in the annual Budget Act or another statute for purposes of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 260, Sec. 2.   (SB 166)   Effective September 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

26250.

The provisions of this chapter are severable. If any provision of this chapter or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 794, Sec. 3.   (SB 1294)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 24. Information Sharing with Financial Institutions [26260. - 26261.]

26260.

(a) An entity that receives deposits, extends credit, conducts fund transfers, transports cash or financial instruments, or provides other financial services does not commit a crime under any California law, including Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 186.9) of Title 7 of Part 1 of the Penal Code, solely by virtue of the fact that the person receiving the benefit of any of those services engages in commercial cannabis activity as a licensee pursuant to this division.

(b) (1) A person licensed to engage in commercial cannabis activity pursuant to this division may request in writing that the department, a local licensing authority, a state or local agency, or a joint powers authority share the person’s application, license, and other regulatory and financial information with a financial institution of the person’s designation. The person shall include in that written request a waiver authorizing the transfer of that information and waiving any confidentiality or privilege that applies to that information.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law that might proscribe the disclosure of application, licensee, and other regulatory and financial
 information, upon receipt of a written request and waiver pursuant to paragraph (1), the department, a local licensing authority, a state or local agency, or a joint powers authority may share application, licensee, and other regulatory and financial information with the financial institution designated by the licensee in that request for the purpose of facilitating the provision of financial services for that licensee.

(3) A person who provides a waiver may withdraw that waiver at any time. Upon receipt of the withdrawal, the department, local licensing authority, state or local agency, or joint powers authority shall cease to share application, licensee, or other regulatory or financial information with the financial institution.

(c) For purposes of this section, all of the following definitions apply:

(1) “Application, licensee, and other regulatory and financial information” includes, but is not limited to, information in the track and trace system established pursuant to Sections 26067 and 26068.

(2) “Entity” means a financial institution as defined in this section, an armored car service licensed by the Department of the California Highway Patrol pursuant to
 Section 2510 of the Vehicle Code that has been contracted by a financial institution, or a person providing financial services to persons licensed to engage in commercial cannabis activity pursuant to this division.

(3) “Financial institutions” means a licensee defined in Section 185 of the Financial Code.

(4) “Firm” has the same meaning as in Section 5035.1.

(5) “Joint powers authority” is one formed pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(6) “State or local agency” has the same meaning as in Section 50001 of the Government Code.

(d) An individual or firm, that practices public accounting pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with
 Section 5000) of Division 3, does not commit a crime under California law solely for providing professional accounting services as specified to persons licensed to engage in commercial cannabis activity pursuant to this division.

(e) This section shall be construed to refer only to the disclosure of information by the department, a local licensing authority, a state or local agency, or a joint powers authority reasonably necessary to facilitate the provision of financial services for the licensee making a request pursuant to this section. Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize the disclosure of confidential or privileged information, nor waive a licensee’s rights to assert confidentiality or privilege, except to a financial institution as provided herein and except as reasonably necessary to facilitate the provision of financial services for the licensee making the request.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 97.   (AB 141)   Effective July 12, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

26261.

An individual or firm, that is licensed by the Department of Insurance pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 1621), Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 1760), or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 1831) of Part 2 of Division 1 of the Insurance Code, does not commit a crime under California law solely for providing insurance or related services to persons licensed to engage in commercial cannabis activity pursuant to this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 393, Sec. 1.   (AB 2568)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 25. Interstate Cannabis Agreements [26300. - 26308.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [26300. - 26300.]

26300.

As used in this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Agreement” means an agreement relating to commercial cannabis authorized under this chapter and entered into between this state and another state or states.

(b) “Contracting state” means a state of the United States, including a district, commonwealth, territory, or possession subject to the legislative authority of the United States, with which the Governor has entered into an agreement pursuant to this chapter.

(c) “Foreign license” means a commercial cannabis license issued under the laws of another
 state that has entered into an agreement pursuant to this chapter.

(d) “State license” means a commercial cannabis license issued by a licensing authority pursuant to this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 396, Sec. 3.   (SB 1326)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Agreements [26301. - 26308.]

26301.

(a) The Governor may enter into an agreement with another state or states authorizing medicinal or adult-use commercial cannabis activity, or both, between entities licensed under the laws of the contracting state and entities operating with a state license, provided that both of the following criteria are met:

(1) The commercial cannabis activities are lawful and subject to licensure under the laws of the contracting state.

(2) With respect to the interstate transportation of cannabis or cannabis products, the agreement prohibits both of the following:

(A) The transportation of cannabis and cannabis products by
 any means other than those authorized under both the laws of the contracting state and the regulations of the department.

(B) The transportation of cannabis and cannabis products through the jurisdiction of a state, district, commonwealth, territory, or possession of the United States that does not authorize that transportation.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, the execution of, and compliance with the terms of, an agreement does not constitute a project for purposes of the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 396, Sec. 3.   (SB 1326)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

26302.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a foreign licensee may engage in commercial cannabis activity with a state licensee and a state licensee may engage in commercial cannabis activity with a foreign licensee, subject to the requirements and limitations set forth in this chapter.

(b) A foreign licensee shall not engage in commercial cannabis activity within the boundaries of this state without a state license, or engage in commercial cannabis activity within a local jurisdiction without a license, permit, or other authorization issued by the local jurisdiction.

(c) A foreign licensee shall be subject to the jurisdiction of this state for the purpose of actions taken for violation of California commercial cannabis laws and regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 396, Sec. 3.   (SB 1326)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

26303.

(a) An agreement shall require that the contracting state impose requirements on foreign licensees with regard to cannabis and cannabis products to be sold or otherwise transferred or distributed within this state that meet or exceed the requirements applicable to state licensees, including all of the following:

(1) Enforceable public health and safety standards that are equivalent to the requirements of this division.

(2) Mandatory participation in a system administered by the state to regulate and track the cultivation, manufacturing, distribution, transportation, sale, and destruction of cannabis and cannabis
 products from seed to sale.

(3) Standards for the testing of cannabis or cannabis products that meet or exceed the standards applicable to testing laboratories licensed under this division.

(4) Requirements for the packaging and labeling of cannabis and cannabis products that meet or exceed the packaging and labeling requirements established pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 26120).

(5) Requirements for quality assurance and inspection of cannabis or cannabis products that meet or exceed the requirements applicable to cannabis or cannabis products cultivated, manufactured, or sold by state licensees.

(6) Restrictions on marketing, labeling, and
 advertising within this state by foreign licensees that meet or exceed the restrictions on state licensees established in Section 26063 and Chapter 15 (commencing with Section 26150).

(7) A process for the identification of adulterated or misbranded cannabis products, and the destruction of those products, using standards that meet or exceed the standards and procedures established pursuant to this division.

(b) An agreement shall require that the contracting state impose restrictions upon advertising, marketing, labeling, or sale within the contracting state that meet or exceed the restrictions established in Section 26063.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 396, Sec. 3.   (SB 1326)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

26304.

(a) An agreement shall include provisions requiring the department and the appropriate regulatory authorities of the contracting state to address public health and welfare emergencies concerning cannabis or cannabis products that are sold or intended for sale within this state, including for the prompt recall or embargo of adulterated or misbranded cannabis or cannabis products.

(b) An agreement shall include provisions requiring the appropriate regulatory authorities of each state to investigate instances of alleged noncompliance with the commercial cannabis regulatory programs upon request by the other state and in accordance with mutually agreed-upon procedures. An
 agreement shall include provisions requiring the contracting state to
 reasonably cooperate with California investigations concerning foreign licensees, and requiring the department to reasonably cooperate with investigations by the contracting state concerning persons or entities holding state licenses.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 396, Sec. 3.   (SB 1326)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

26305.

An agreement shall include provisions determined by the Governor to promote the inclusion and support of individuals and communities in the cannabis industry who are linked to populations or neighborhoods that were negatively or disproportionately impacted by cannabis criminalization.
